Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 1
SPECIAL DISTRICT PROVISIONS

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as articles 8-10, 16-18, 22, and 26 of chapter 89, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1981, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1981, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For foreclosure proceedings for a special district, see part 11 of article 25 of title 31.

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 CONTROL ACT

PART 3 ORGANIZATION

PART 4 INCLUSION OF TERRITORY

PART 5 EXCLUSION OF TERRITORY

PART 6 CONSOLIDATION

PART 7 DISSOLUTION

PART 8 ELECTIONS

PART 9 DIRECTORS - ORGANIZATION OF BOARD

PART 10 GENERAL POWERS

PART 11 FINANCIAL POWERS

PART 12 LEVY AND COLLECTION OF TAXES

PART 13 SPECIAL DISTRICT REFUNDING

PART 14 COMPOSITION OR ADJUSTMENT
OF INDEBTEDNESS
OF LOCAL TAXING DISTRICTS

PART 15 RELIEF OF RESIDENTIAL TAXPAYERS
FROM LIEN OF SPECIAL DISTRICT
TAXES FOR GENERAL
OBLIGATION INDEBTEDNESS

PART 16 CERTIFICATION AND NOTICE OF
SPECIAL DISTRICT TAXES FOR
GENERAL OBLIGATION INDEBTEDNESS

PART 17 PROPERTY TAX REDUCTION AGREEMENT

PART 18 PUBLIC IMPROVEMENTS - SPECIAL DISTRICT CONTRACTS